Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201919-419
Mayor; city council members; office; duties.

The mayor and city council members in a city under the commission plan of government shall maintain offices at the city hall, and the mayor shall regularly investigate all public affairs concerning the interest of the city and investigate and ascertain the efficiency and manner in which all departments of the city government are being conducted. The mayor shall recommend to the city council all such matters as in his or her judgment should receive the investigation, consideration, or action of the city council.

Laws 1911, c. 24, § 16, p. 163;

R.S.1913, § 5303;

C.S.1922, § 4526;

C.S.1929, § 19-416;

R.S.1943, § 19-419;

Laws 1979, LB 80, § 47;

Laws 2019, LB193, § 24.